Hawaii statutes.
§377-1 Definitions. When used in this
chapter:

"All union agreement" means an
agreement between an employer and the representative of the employer's
employees in a collective bargaining unit whereby all of the employees in such
unit are required to be members of a single labor organization.

"Board" means the Hawaii labor
relations board, provided for by sections 26-20, 89-5, and 377-2.

"Collective bargaining" is the
negotiating by an employer and a majority of the employer's employees in a
collective bargaining unit (or their representatives) concerning representation
or terms and conditions of employment of such employees in a mutually genuine
effort to reach an agreement with reference to the subject under negotiation.

"Collective bargaining unit" means
all of the employees of one employer (employed within the State), except that
where the board has determined and certified that such employees engaged in a
single craft, division, department, or plant as provided in section 377-5(b)
constitute a separate bargaining unit they shall be so considered. Two or more
collective bargaining units may bargain collectively through the same
representative where a majority of the employees or each separate unit have
voted by secret ballot as provided in section 377-5(c) so to do.

"Election" means a proceeding in
which the employees in a collective bargaining unit cast a secret ballot for
collective bargaining representatives or for any other purpose specified in
this chapter and shall include elections conducted by the board, or, unless the
context clearly indicates otherwise, by any tribunal having competent
jurisdiction or whose jurisdiction was accepted by the parties.

"Employee" includes any person, other
than an independent contractor, working for another for hire in the State, and
shall not be limited to the employees of a particular employer unless the
context clearly indicates otherwise. "Employee" includes any
individual whose work has ceased solely as a consequence of or in connection
with any current labor dispute or because of any unfair labor practice on the
part of an employer and who has not:

(1) Refused or failed to return to work upon the
final disposition of a labor dispute or a charge of an unfair labor practice by
a tribunal having competent jurisdiction of the same or whose jurisdiction was
accepted by the employee or the employee's representative;

(2) Been found to be committing or a party to any
unfair labor practice hereunder;

(3) Obtained regular and substantially equivalent
employment elsewhere; or

(4) Been absent from the individual's employment for
a substantial period of time during which reasonable expectancy of settlement
has ceased (except by an employer's unlawful refusal to bargain) and whose
place has been filled by another engaged in the regular manner for an
indefinite or protracted period and not merely for the duration of a strike or
lockout.

"Employee" does not include any individual
employed in the domestic service of a family or person at the family's or
person's home or any individual employed by the individual's parent or spouse,
or any person employed in an executive or supervisory capacity, or any
individual employed by any employer employing less than two individuals, or any
individual subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Railway Labor Act or the
National Labor Relations Act, as amended from time to time.
"Employee" includes any individual subject to the jurisdiction of the
National Labor Relations Act, as amended from time to time, but over whom the National
Labor Relations Board has declined to exercise jurisdiction or has indicated by
its decisions and policies that it will not assume jurisdiction.

"Employer" means a person who engages
the services of an employee, and includes any person acting on behalf of an
employer, but shall not include the State or any political subdivision thereof,
or any labor organization or anyone acting in behalf of such organization other
than when it is acting as an employer in fact.

"Labor dispute" includes any
controversy concerning terms, tenure or conditions of employment, or concerning
the association or representation of persons in negotiating, fixing,
maintaining, changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment,
regardless of whether the disputants stand in the proximate relation of
employer and employee.

"Person" includes one or more
individuals, partnerships, associations, corporations, legal representatives,
trustees, or receivers.

"Person employed in an executive or
supervisory capacity" means any employee who has the authority to hire or
fire other employees or whose suggestions and recommendations as to hiring or
firing and as to the advancement, promotion, or demotion of other employees
will be given particular weight; but shall not mean registered nurses whose
compensation is determined on an hourly basis or who are subject to supervision
by any person other than the person in charge of all registered nurses at the
employer's premises.

"Representative" includes any person
chosen by an employee to represent the employee.

"Secondary boycott" includes
combining or conspiring to cause or threaten to cause injury to one with whom
no labor dispute exists, whether by:

(1) Withholding patronage, labor, or other beneficial
business intercourse;

(2) Picketing;

(3) Refusing to handle, install, use, or work on
particular materials, equipment, or supplies; or

(4) Using any other unlawful means,

in order to bring one against one's will into a
concerted plan to coerce or inflict damage upon another.

"Unfair labor practice" means any
unfair labor practice as defined in sections 377-6 to 377-8. [L 1945, c 250,
§3; am L 1955, c 11, §1; RL 1955, §90-2; am L 1961, c 31, §1; am L 1963, c 53,
§1; am L 1965, c 244, §1; am L 1967, c 253, §2; HRS §377-1; am L 1971, c 91,
§1; am L 1985, c 251, §12; gen ch 1985; am L 2016, c 55, §5]

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted and definitions rearranged
pursuant to §23G-15.

Case Notes

Employee: Individual subject to N.L.R.A. excluded, 49 H.
426, 428, 421 P.2d 294 (1966). Applies to employees of East-West Center. 5 H.
App. 37, 677 P.2d 477 (1984).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next